District of Columbia statutes.
3-512.01

Repealed

Permitted practice without a license; exemption for services provided during emergency.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 13a
as added Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 101(b), 55 DCR 9186
July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 14(b), 57 DCR 3655
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184